Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1214
Explosives control; applicability of sections.

(1) Sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 shall apply to persons engaged in the manufacture, ownership, possession, storage, use, transportation, purchase, sale, or gift of explosive materials, except as may be otherwise indicated herein.

(2) Sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 shall not apply to explosive materials while being transported in conformity with federal law or regulations, nor, except as may be otherwise provided in such sections, to the ownership, possession, storage, use, transportation, purchase, or sale of explosive materials by the armed forces of the United States, the National Guard, other reserve components of the armed forces of the United States, and the duly constituted police and firefighting forces of the United States and of the state and its political subdivisions in the lawful discharge of their official duties.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 246.